District of Columbia statutes.
9-1219.29

Repealed

Assessment on all lots, pieces or parcels benefited by opening of alley or minor street or by establishment of building line.

Repealed.

Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-201, § 705, 30 DCR 148
1981 Ed., § 7-319.
1981 Ed., §§ 7-320, 7-321.